Vermont statutes. TITLE 3A Executive Orders
Chapter 3. Executive
Executive Order No. 3-80
(No. 08-17) [Transfer of Property in Windsor from BGS to DFW.

WHEREAS, certain State-owned land commonly known as the Windsor Prison Farm located in the Town of Windsor, County of Windsor, herein “the ‘Property,’ ” is presently under the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Administration, Department of Buildings
and General Services (BGS); and

WHEREAS, BGS has no further use for the Property; and

WHEREAS, the Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Fish and Wildlife (DFW), desires the use of the Property for its purposes; and

WHEREAS, upon execution of the property transfer, DFW will be responsible for the maintenance costs, security, heating costs, electrical costs, snow removal, grounds maintenance, overall conditions. Payments in Lieu of Taxes, State historic preservation
requirements and all other costs associated with the administration, ownership and management of the Property.

NOW, THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor of the State of Vermont, do hereby transfer and set over to DFW for its purposes, from the jurisdiction and control of BGS, the following land and premises, to wit:

Being collectively all the lands and premises conveyed to the State of Vermont by the following:

quit claim deed of Joseph C. Parker et al. on December 22, 1894, which is recorded in the Windsor land records at Volume 30, Pages 403-404;

warranty deed of Arthur W. Hunter and Julia E. Hunter on January 10, 1916, which is recorded in the Windsor land records at Volume 34, Page 83;

warranty deed of William Dana on March 31, 1927, which is recorded in the Windsor land records at Volume 39, Page 46;

quit claim deed of Lyman W. Cook on August 1, 1927, which is recorded in the Windsor land records at Volume 39, Page 280;

warranty deed of Harvey F. Chase and Harriet Chase on September 30, 1927, which is recorded in the Windsor land records at Volume 39, Page 84;

quit claim deed of William J. Herman et al. on November 25, 1927, which is recorded in the Windsor land records at Volume 39, Pages 521-523; and

warranty deed of George B. Spence and Nellie S. Spence on November 6, 1935, which is recorded in the Windsor land records at Volume 47, Page 38.

Excepting from the above those lands and premises, comprising approximately 118.57 acres and including all buildings, appurtenances and improvements thereon, to be retained by BGS as designated in the attached survey plat entitled “State Prison Farm at
Windsor” prepared by Robert W. Farnsworth and dated October 7, 2016.

This Executive Order supersedes and replaces Executive Order 08-15 (codified as 3-70). This Executive Order shall take effect upon execution.

Dated March 13, 2017

Executive Order No. 3-81
(No. 09-17) [Governor’s Opioid Coordination Council.

WHEREAS, opioid addiction and abuse in the State of Vermont negatively affect all people, of all ages, in all communities, at all income levels; and

WHEREAS, opioid addiction and abuse has caused and continues to cause an increase in drug trafficking and other criminal offenses throughout Vermont which erodes our way of life and endangers all Vermonters; and

WHEREAS, opioid addiction and abuse has caused an increasing number of overdose deaths in Vermont, particularly among young Vermonters; and

WHEREAS, the fight against opioid addiction and abuse continues to consume an increasing portion of scarce State resources; and

WHEREAS, because it is not feasible or effective to rely solely on state social service agencies or law enforcement to resolve the opioid crisis, all Vermonters must play an important role in helping to eradicate this scourge from our State; and

WHEREAS, to effectively meet this challenge, the State, municipalities, and all Vermonters must work together on a three-pronged approach to this crisis:

• the demand for opioids must be significantly reduced through education, the building of strong families and neighborhoods, and increased economic and job opportunities;

• those addicted to opioids must be afforded adequate and effective treatment and recovery opportunities; and

• the supply of opioids must be reduced through robust and coordinated federal, state, and local law enforcement targeting drug traffickers and through more effective means of preventing the diversion of prescription opioids; and

WHEREAS, the Governor recognizes the diversity of Vermont municipalities and the distinct differences of population, geography, and resources; and

WHEREAS, the successful fight against opioid addiction and abuse will rely on the strength of this local diversity to enable and empower local authorities to adapt recommended policies, programs, and best practices to the needs of the various communities;
and

WHEREAS, the City of Rutland has seen a significant decrease in opioid-related crime after successfully implementing Project VISION, a locally-driven strategy to identify and eliminate neighborhood drug markets utilizing a creative, collaborative grass-roots
effort involving individuals, families, local businesses, churches, law enforcement, community development organizations, and health care professionals; and

WHEREAS, in order to fully enable and empower local communities in their fight against opioid addiction and abuse and to build on the success of Project VISION, there is a need to ensure full coordination among State agencies, State municipalities, law
enforcement, and treatment providers to strengthen Vermont’s overall response to the opioid crisis through effective opioid addiction prevention, treatment, recovery and enforcement action plans.

NOW, THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED that I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor, do hereby create the Governor’s Opioid Coordination Council, as follows:

Composition and Appointments.

The Council shall consist of the following members who shall be geographically representative of the State to the extent possible:

A.
The Commissioner of Public Safety, Secretary of the Agency of Health and Human Services, and a community leader to be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the Governor, all of whom shall serve as Co-Chairs;

B.
The Commissioner of the Department of Health or designee;

C.
The Attorney General, or designee;

D.
The United States Attorney, District of Vermont, or designee;

E.
One representative of the Vermont Mayors Coalition;

F.
One representative of a local non-profit housing organization to be appointed by the Governor;

G.
One educator involved in substance abuse prevention appointed by the Governor;

H.
One representative of State municipalities appointed by the Vermont League of Cities and Towns;

I.
One substance abuse prevention and treatment professional, appointed by the Governor;

J.
One representative of the Vermont Association of Mental Health, Addiction and Recovery;

K.
One representative of a designated agency appointed by the Governor;

L.
One representative of the Vermont Association of Hospitals and Health Systems;

M.
One representative of the Vermont Sheriffs’ Association;

N.
One representative of the Vermont Association of Chiefs of Police;

O.
One representative of the United States Drug Enforcement Administration;

P.
One first responder to be appointed by the Governor.

Q.
The Chief Justice, or designee;

R.
One representative of Vermont’s business community to be appointed by the Governor; and

S.
One at-large member to be appointed by the Governor.

Members appointed by the Governor shall serve for two-year terms, beginning as of May 1, 2017.

Director of Drug Policy.

The Governor shall designate a Director of Drug Policy who shall act as the Executive Director of the Council and who will support, coordinate, and monitor the progress of the Council on a day-to-day basis.

Council Charge and Process.

The mission of the Council will be to lead and strengthen Vermont’s response to the opioid crisis by ensuring full interagency and intra-agency coordination between state and local governments in the areas of prevention, treatment, recovery and law enforcement
activities. Where practicable, the Council will apply the strategies and lessons learned from VISION to other communities throughout Vermont. The Council shall initially meet at least monthly. The Council shall:

A.
Identify best practices for communities to address opioid addiction and abuse in order to assist them in: (1) significantly reducing the demand for opioids through prevention and education; (2) providing treatment
and recovery services to those afflicted with opioid addiction; and (3) significantly reducing the supply of illegal opioids;

B.
Develop and adopt data driven performance measures and outcomes which will allow State and local community programs to determine whether they are meeting their goals and objectives in reducing opioid addiction
and abuse;

C.
Review existing State health, mental health, and drug and alcohol addiction laws, regulations, policies, and programs and propose changes to eliminate redundancy and break down barriers faced by communities in
coordinating action with State government;

D.
Propose legislation to strengthen a Statewide approach to fight opioid addiction and abuse and facilitate adaptation to the changing nature and multiple facets of the opioid crisis;

E.
Consult and coordinate with federal agencies and officials as well as those in surrounding states;

F.
Work in coordination with the Alcohol and Drug Abuse Council created pursuant to 18 V.S.A. 4803;

G.
Report to the Governor on a quarterly basis and as otherwise required by the Governor regarding: (1) recommendations for resource, policy, and legislative or regulatory changes; and (2) progress made under State
and local programs measured against established data driven performance measures; and

H.
In consultation with the Director of Drug Policy, do all things necessary to carry out the purpose of this Executive Order.

The Council may designate subcommittees as necessary. The Council shall receive administrative support from the Governor’s Office and the Agency of Administration.

Effective Date.

This Executive Order supersedes and replaces Executive Order 02-17 (codified as 3-77). This Executive Order shall take effect upon execution.

Dated May 8, 2017

Executive Order No. 3-82
(No. 15-17) [Governor’s Marijuana Advisory Commission.

WHEREAS, the States of Alaska, California, Colorado, Maine, Massachusetts, Nevada, Oregon and Washington and the District of Columbia have taken steps to legalize the recreational use of marijuana and/or establish systems for the licensing, regulation
and taxation of the sale and distribution of marijuana; and

WHEREAS, Vermont must adopt a balanced approach to marijuana legalization which takes into consideration realities of current consumption levels, legalization in neighboring jurisdictions, and facts regarding local impacts, the risk of harm to our youth,
impaired driving and the social consequences of drug use and addiction, particularly in the context of the State’s opioid crisis; and

WHEREAS, Vermont can pursue a regional approach with the northeastern states of Maine and Massachusetts, as well as Canada, to create universal highway safety and public health regulations to ensure health and safety as it relates to recreational marijuana
usage; and

WHEREAS, Vermont governors have created various executive orders over the years which address complex issues facing children and youth, public safety, criminal justice, substance abuse and population health; and

WHEREAS, even if one accepts limited recreational use of marijuana as an individual choice, this choice cannot be permitted to adversely impact public health or safety, especially roadway safety and children’s health; and

WHEREAS, in order to assess the potential for a system which permits the recreational use of marijuana and/or regulates and taxes the sale and distribution of marijuana in a way which is not volume- or profit-driven or detrimental to the interests of
a safe and healthy population, there is a need for a thoughtful and thorough consideration of public health, public safety and financial resource issues.

NOW THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED, that I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor, do hereby create the Governor’s Marijuana Advisory Commission, as follows:

Composition and Appointments.

The Commission shall be advisory to the Governor and consist of the following thirteen members:

Meetings.

(1)
The Governor shall call the first meeting of the Commission to occur on or before October 1, 2017. The subcommittees shall also convene their first meetings on or before October 1, 2017.

(2)
A majority of membership of the Commission or each subcommittee, as the case may be, shall constitute a quorum.

Powers and Duties.

The Commission, upon consultation with its three subcommittees, shall proceed with its work in two phases:

(1)
In order to establish a common baseline understanding of the most credible data regarding health endpoints of marijuana use and safety impacts of legalization, on or before November 15, 2017, the Subcommittees
on Highway Safety and Education and Prevention shall assess high-quality primary research, including evidence-based Vermont data to the extent it is available, for the following groups of health and safety endpoints and report
to the Commission:

(i)

Injury and death:
All-cause mortality, occupational injury, motor vehicle crash, overdose injury and death;

(ii)

Prenatal, perinatal, and postnatal exposure to marijuana:
Pregnancy complications for the mother, fetal growth and development, neonatal conditions, later outcomes for the infant;

(iii)

Psychosocial:
Cognition (learning, memory, attention, intelligence), academic achievement and educational outcomes, employment and income, social relationships and other social roles;

(iv)

Mental health:
Schizophrenia and other psychoses, bipolar disorders, depression; suicide, anxiety, posttraumatic stress disorder;

(v)

Problem Marijuana use:
Marijuana use disorder;

(vi)

Marijuana use and abuse of other substances:
Abuse of other substances; and

(vii)

Crime rates:
Crimes directly or indirectly shown to be related to marijuana use, production or storage in jurisdictions with marijuana legalization and decriminalization.

(2)
On or before January 15, 2018, the Commission shall produce a report making recommendations to the Governor to date regarding:

(i)
Need for the creation, implementation and funding of statewide evidence-based youth prevention programs;

(ii)
Adequacy of and funding for substance abuse facilities;

(iii)
Adequacy of and funding for broad-based messaging or public awareness campaigns to address the risk of harm posed by marijuana to Vermonters;

(iv)
Adequacy of and funding for broad-based messaging or public awareness campaigns to address the dangers of driving while impaired due to marijuana, similar to those targeted to alcohol consumers;

(v)
An appropriate impairment testing mechanism, including the possible merits of saliva-based testing standards;

(vi)
Adequacy of and funding for drug recognition experts (DREs) and training;

(vii)
Capacity for in-state testing and analysis of toxicology samples for DUIs related to drugs such as marijuana;

(viii)
Feasibility of regional impairment standards;

(ix)
Adequacy of and funding for resources that municipalities will need to support professional and volunteer fire, police, and emergency services resulting from access and use of recreational marijuana;

(x)
Need for a performance benchmark or benchmarks to be assessed before the further decriminalization or legalization of recreational marijuana use or establishment of a tax and regulatory system, such as the percentage
of Vermont youth who recognize and understand the risk of harm posed by marijuana, a statistically significant reversal and decline in the number of major crashes due to marijuana-impaired drivers, a statistically significant
reversal and decline in the number of DUIs related to marijuana, and capacity at the Department of Public Safety to meet the need for DREs and in-house analysis and toxicology testing related to marijuana;

(xi)
Miscellaneous issues, such as host liability and landlord liability in the context of marijuana availability in homes and public places, security of marijuana storage, impacts on the cost of automobile, workers
compensation and homeowner insurance, local zoning and search and seizure considerations; and

(xii)
Changes to Vermont law required to protect those under 21 years old and ensure highway safety.

(3)
Pending development of comprehensive education, prevention and highway safety strategies, on or before December 15, 2018, the Commission will provide recommendations to the Governor on implementing and operating
a comprehensive regulatory and revenue system for an adult marijuana market, and accompanying legislation if deemed necessary. At a minimum, the Commission shall:

(i)
Summarize its findings to date;

(ii)
Recommend a business plan for a comprehensive regulatory and revenue system which completely self-funds the regulatory infrastructure at both the State and local level, including:

a.
An appropriate tax rate;

b.
Required equipment and/or staffing resources required to address impaired driving due to marijuana or marijuana and alcohol at both the State and local level;

c.
The additional costs of substance abuse and treatment; and

d.
The additional costs of public awareness campaigns and statewide evidence-based youth education and prevention programs to control access by minors.

(iii)
Recommend licensure costs and requirements;

(iv)
Estimate revenue needed to initially fund a comprehensive net-revenue generating regulatory and revenue system from public and private investment, licensing and operating fees, and grant sources;

(v)
Determine a set impairment threshold for operating a motor vehicle on State roads and highways, identify an appropriate impairment testing mechanism, and/or recommend increased DREs and training;

(vi)
Recommend a plan for continued monitoring and reporting on impacts to public health, with specific reference to the health endpoints listed in Section III(1) above;

(vii)
Make recommendations regarding:

a.
Workplace safety and if it is appropriate to reform workplace drug testing laws;

b.
Impacts on the economy as a result of third party liability such as restrictions on banking due to Federal laws;

c.
Appropriate measures to address pesticide use, quality control, and labeling for marijuana products;

d.
If there is a business model that will grow the rural economy by giving existing Vermont farmers licensing and regulatory preference for commercial operations; and

(e)
Other miscellaneous matters as determined necessary and appropriate by the Commission.

The Commission will provide ongoing reporting to the Governor on April 1, 2018, July 1, 2018, and October 1, 2018 regarding progress on the foregoing.

Assistance.

The Commission shall have the administrative, technical, and legal assistance of the Office of the Governor and the Secretary of Administration. Each subcommittee shall have the technical, legal, and administrative support of the Agency or Department
of each respective subcommittee Chair.

Expense Reimbursement.

I hereby authorize per diem compensation and reasonable and necessary expense reimbursement for travel and food for members who are not full-time State employees pursuant to

32 V.S.A. § 1010(e)
.

Effective Date.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon execution.

Dated September 7, 2017

two members appointed by the Committee on Committees;

two members appointed by the Speaker of the House;

two members appointed by the Governor, who shall be Co-Chairs;

the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets or designee;

the Commissioner of the Department of Public Safety or designee

the Commissioner of the Department of Health or designee;

the Secretary of the Agency of Commerce and Community Development or designee;

the Commissioner of the Department of Taxes or designee;

the Attorney General or designee; and

the Executive Director of the States’ Attorneys and Sheriffs, or designee.

The Commission shall have three subcommittees who shall meet at least monthly, consult with experts and stakeholder groups as needed, and report findings and recommendations to the Commission on a schedule set by the Co-Chairs. Members of the Commission
and subcommittees shall be appointed by the Governor for three-year terms unless otherwise specified as follows:

(1)
Roadway safety. One subcommittee shall be formed to examine and present findings on drugged driving and recommend appropriate measures to ensure roadway safety. Additionally, this subcommittee shall pursue a regional
impairment threshold for the New England states, and parity in drugged driving roadway safety laws and penalties.

(i)
Membership. This subcommittee shall be chaired by the Commissioner of the Department of Public Safety. Other members shall include the Secretary of the Agency of Transportation or designee, one member designated
by the Criminal Justice Training Council, one member designated by the Vermont League of Cities and Towns, the Defender General or designee, the Director of the Vermont Forensic Laboratory or designee, one representative of
the Judiciary appointed by the Chief Justice of the Vermont Supreme Court, and one emergency medical service provider.

(2)
Education and prevention. One subcommittee shall be formed to examine and present findings on how best to measure and reduce impacts on public health; how to regulate edibles; how to regulate THC concentrations
in marijuana and marijuana products; how to discourage consumption of, and restrict access to marijuana by minors; and how to effectively implement evidence-based education and prevention strategies for those under 21 years
of age.

(i)
Membership. This subcommittee shall be chaired by the Commissioner of the Department of Health. Other members shall include, the Secretary of the Agency of Education or designee, one member designated by the Vermont
Chapter of the American Academy of Pediatrics, one educational leader designated jointly by the Vermont Superintendents Association and the Vermont Principals’ Association, one medical professional currently practicing medicine
designated by the Vermont Medical Society, one member with expertise in matters affecting at-risk Vermont youth, one substance abuse counselor, and one member with expertise in marketing.

(3)
Taxation and Regulation. One subcommittee shall be formed to examine and present findings regarding the sale and taxation of marijuana for recreational use, and assess structures for doing so which address areas
such as banking, landlord and tenant relationships, local zoning, insurance, host liability, economic sustainability, and reduction of the illegal marijuana market. This subcommittee shall assist the Roadway Safety and Education
and Prevention Subcommittees on identifying funding strategies and options for recommended resources and programming based on a taxed and regulated marijuana market and other sources.

(i)
Membership. This subcommittee shall be chaired by the Commissioner of the Department of Tax. Other members shall include the Secretary of the Agency of Commerce and Community Development or designee, the Commissioner
of the Department of Financial Regulation or designee, the Chair of the Liquor Control Board, one member designated by the Vermont Bankers Association, one member designated by the Association of Vermont Credit Unions, one
member designated by the Vermont League of Cities and Towns, one representative of the business community, and one member with expertise in national tax and regulatory systems designated by the Vermont Coalition to Regulate
Marijuana.

Executive Order No. 3-83
(No. 18-17) [Governor’s Cybersecurity Advisory Team.

WHEREAS, increasingly sophisticated cyber attacks aimed at breaching and damaging essential computer networks, infrastructure, and operations in Vermont represent major security risks and increase the State’s vulnerability to adverse economic impacts,
life-threatening institutional disruption, critical infrastructure damage, privacy violations and identify theft; and

WHEREAS, the advancing complexity and incidence of these cyber attacks demands heightened levels of coordination, information sharing, preparation and emergency response capabilities among State government and federal agencies, local governments, tribal
governments, utilities, private companies, academic institutions, and other entities in order to protect computer networks and critical infrastructure systems from damage or unauthorized access; and

WHEREAS, Vermont State government agencies protect the State’s computer networks and investigate criminal attacks on State computer networks and critical infrastructure systems under current State law.

NOW THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED, that I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor, do hereby create the Governor’s Cybersecurity Advisory Team, as follows:

Composition and Appointments.

The Cybersecurity Advisory Team shall consist of not more than 10 members to be appointed by the Governor from inside and outside of State government. The State members shall include the State’s Chief Information Security Officer, the State Chief Information
Officer, the Governor’s Homeland Security Advisor or designee, a representative from the Vermont National Guard, the Attorney General or designee, and a representative from Vermont Emergency Management. Non-State members may
include leaders from the utilities sector, higher education, health care and business. The Cybersecurity Advisory Team may, in its discretion, establish inter-agency working groups to support its mission, drawing membership
from any agency or department of State government. The Cybersecurity Advisory Team may also, in its discretion, consult with private sector professionals and those from other states, the federal government and municipalities
for information and advice on issues related to the Team’s charge as set forth herein.

The Cybersecurity Advisory Team shall receive administrative and staff support from the Secretary of Digital Services and legal support from the Governor’s Counsel and the Department of Public Safety.

Cybersecurity Advisory Team Charge and Process.

The Cybersecurity Advisory Team will be advisory to the Governor on the State’s Cybersecurity posture. The Cybersecurity Advisory Team shall meet at the call of the Chair, but not less frequently than quarterly, beginning October 15, 2017. The focus of
the Cybersecurity Advisory Team shall be to:

A.
Develop a strategic plan for protecting State of Vermont public sector and private sector information and systems;

B.
Formally evaluate statewide Cybersecurity readiness and develop best practices for policies and procedures to strengthen administrative, technical and physical Cybersecurity safeguards as a resource for State government,
Vermont businesses and the public;

C.
Build strong relationships and lines of communications among the State government, federal government, and the private sector designed to ensure resilience of electronic information systems;

D.
Build strong partnerships with local universities and colleges in order to leverage Cybersecurity resources; and

E.
Identify and advise on opportunities to:

Ensure Vermont promotes, attracts and retains a highly-skilled Cybersecurity workforce;

Raise citizen awareness through outreach and public service announcements;

Provide technical capabilities, training, and advice to local government and the private sector;

Provide expertise to the State Legislature regarding statutory language that could further protect critical assets, infrastructure, services and personally identifiable information;

Advise on strategic, operational and budgetary impacts to the State; and

Engage State and federal partners in assessing and managing risk.

Effective Date.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon execution.

Dated October 10, 2017